District of Columbia statutes.
42-1007

Giving of absolute power — Where no remainder on grantee’s estate.

In all cases where such power of disposition is given and no remainder is limited on the estate of the grantee of the power, such grantee shall be entitled to an absolute fee.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1353, ch. 854, § 1043

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-107.
1973 Ed., § 45-1007.